Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 2. Annexation and Detachment.

Sec. 29.06.040.
Municipal boundary changes.

The Local Boundary Commission may consider any proposed municipal boundary change. The commission may amend the proposed change and may impose conditions on the proposed change. If the commission determines that the proposed change, as amended or conditioned if appropriate, meets applicable standards under the state constitution and commission regulations and is in the best interests of the state, it may accept the proposed change. Otherwise, it shall reject the proposed change. A Local Boundary Commission decision under this subsection may be appealed under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The Local Boundary Commission may present a proposed municipal boundary change to the legislature during the first 10 days of a regular session. The change becomes effective 45 days after presentation or at the end of the session, whichever is earlier, unless disapproved by a resolution concurred in by a majority of the members of each house.

In addition to the regulations governing annexation by local action adopted under AS

44.33.812

, the Local Boundary Commission shall establish procedures for annexation and detachment of territory by municipalities by local action. The procedures established under this subsection must include a provision that

a proposed annexation must be approved by a majority of votes on the question cast by voters residing in the annexing municipality;

a proposed annexation or detachment must be approved by a majority of votes on the question cast by voters residing in the area proposed to be annexed or detached;

municipally owned property adjoining the municipality may be annexed by ordinance without voter approval; and

an area adjoining the municipality may be annexed by ordinance without an election if all property owners and voters in the area petition the governing body.

A boundary change effected under (a) and (b) of this section prevails over a boundary change initiated by local action, without regard to priority in time.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 14 ch 58 SLA 1994; am § 36 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 29 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 46 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For Local Boundary Commission and procedures, see AS

44.33.810

—

44.33.828

.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for annexation to cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 3.

For standards for annexation to boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 4.

For standards for merger of municipalities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 5.

For standards for detachment from cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 7.

For standards for detachment from boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 8.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 28, 2006, inserted paragraph (c)(1), making related changes, and substituted “or detachment” for “and detachment” in paragraph (c)(2).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Discussion of application and scope of [former] 19 AAC 10.230(a). January 14, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.06.050.
Annexation of military reservations.

A military reservation may be annexed to a municipality in the same manner as prescribed for other territory under AS

29.06.040

.
If a city in a borough annexes a military reservation under this section, the area encompassing the military reservation automatically is annexed to the borough in which the city is located.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.055.
Property taxes in annexed or detached areas.

Unless the annexation takes effect on January 1, the annexing municipality may not levy property taxes in an annexed area before January 1 of the year immediately following the year in which the annexation takes effect. However, notwithstanding other provisions of law, the municipality may provide services in the annexed area that are funded wholly or partially with property taxes during the period before the municipality may levy property taxes in the annexed area.

If an area is detached from a municipality, all property taxes that are levied by that municipality on property in the detached area based on an assessment that occurred before the effective date of the detachment remain valid. AS

29.45.290

—

29.45.500

apply to the enforcement of those taxes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 12 SLA 2004)

Sec. 29.06.060.
Application.

AS

29.06.040

—

29.06.060

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)